Hawaii statutes.
[§103F-302] Delegation of authority
of the administrator of the state procurement office. Subject to rules
adopted pursuant to this chapter, the administrator may delegate any authority
or responsibility conferred by this chapter to a head or the heads of
purchasing agencies. [L 1997, c 190, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next